Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6102
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest that a domestic mutual insurer be permitted to convert to a stock insurer on terms and conditions that are fair and equitable to such mutual insurer's policyholders. The Legislature further finds that because it is not possible to anticipate all of the circumstances and considerations which may arise incident to a conversion from a mutual insurer to a stock insurer, the Director of Insurance should have broad authority in reviewing such conversion, and the procedures and criteria to be applied by the director should be flexible within the parameters of the Insurers Demutualization Act. The act shall be liberally construed to effect the legislative intent set forth in this section and shall not be interpreted to limit the powers granted to the director by other provisions of the law.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 42.